Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-225
Condemnation proceedings; land under lease contract; interest of owner; value assessed.

If the land to be taken is held under lease contract, the board of appraisers also shall make a finding as to the interest of the owner in such lease contract, if any, and such value shall be separately assessed.

Laws 1899, c. 69, § 11, p. 304;

Laws 1905, c. 144, § 1, p. 582;

Laws 1907, c. 134, § 1, p. 437;

Laws 1913, c. 40, § 1, p. 135;

R.S.1913, § 5855;

Laws 1915, c. 103, § 1, p. 247;

Laws 1921, c. 80, § 2, p. 290;

C.S.1922, § 5191;

Laws 1923, c. 61, § 1, p. 185;

Laws 1925, c. 135, § 1, p. 354;

Laws 1929, c. 188, § 1, p. 652;

C.S.1929, § 72-211;

Laws 1931, c. 118, § 1, p. 345;

Laws 1935, c. 164, § 1, p. 611;

Laws 1941, c. 145, § 1, p. 576;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 72-211;

Laws 1943, c. 160, § 2, p. 574;

R.S.1943, § 72-225;

Laws 1967, c. 466, § 6, p. 1447.

Value of interests of state and lessee are required to be separately assessed, and the sum of the value of the separate interests may be more than the value of the land as an unencumbered whole. State v. Platte Valley P. P. & I. Dist., 147 Neb. 289, 23 N.W.2d 300 (1946).